files/usr/share/postgresql/9.6/tsearch_data/russian.affix
SFX M Y 108
SFX M   ЮШУС ЛХФУС        ЮШУС
SFX M   ЮШУС ЛХУШ         ЮШУС
SFX M   ЮШ   ЛХФ          ЮШ
SFX M   ЮШ   ЛХ           ЮШ
SFX M   ЩФШУС ПЕЫШУС       ЩФШУС
SFX M   ЩФШУС ПЕФУС        ЩФШУС
SFX M   ЩФШУС ПЕФЕУШ       ЩФШУС
SFX M   ЩФШУС ПЕНУС        ЩФШУС
SFX M   ЩФШУС ПАФУС        ЩФШУС
SFX M   ЩФШУС ПАУШ         ЩФШУС
SFX M   ЩФШ  ПЕЫШ         ЩФШ
SFX M   ЩФШ  ПЕФЕ         ЩФШ
SFX M   ЩФШ  ПЕФ          ЩФШ
SFX M   ЩФШ  ПЕН          ЩФШ
SFX M   ЩФШ  ПАФ          ЩФШ
SFX M   ЩФШ  ПА           ЩФШ
SFX M   ШУС  УС           ХФШУС
SFX M   ШУС  ЕЫШУС        ЮШУС
SFX M   ШУС  ЕФУС         ЮШУС
SFX M   ШУС  ЕФЕУШ        ЮШУС
SFX M   ШУС  ЕНУС         ЮШУС
SFX M   ШУС  ЈЫШУС        ЮШУС
SFX M   ШУС  ЈФУС         ЮШУС
SFX M   ШУС  ЈФЕУШ        ЮШУС
SFX M   ШУС  ЈНУС         ЮШУС
SFX M   Ш    ЕЫШ          ЮШ
SFX M   Ш    ЕФЕ          ЮШ
SFX M   Ш    ЕФ           ЮШ
SFX M   Ш    ЕН           ЮШ
SFX M   Ш    ЈЫШ          ЮШ
SFX M   Ш    ЈФЕ          ЮШ
SFX M   Ш    ЈФ           ЮШ
SFX M   Ш    ЈН           ЮШ
SFX M   ХФШУС ЕЫШУС        ХФШУС
SFX M   ХФШУС ЕФУС         ХФШУС
SFX M   ХФШУС ЕФЕУШ        ХФШУС
SFX M   ХФШУС ЕНУС         ХФШУС
SFX M   ХФШ  Х            ХФШ
SFX M   ХФШ  ЕЫШ          ХФШ
SFX M   ХФШ  ЕФЕ          ХФШ
SFX M   ХФШ  ЕФ           ХФШ
SFX M   ХФШ  ЕН           ХФШ
SFX M   ФШУС УШ           ХФШУС
SFX M   ФШУС ЕЫШУС        [БЕ]ФШУС
SFX M   ФШУС ЕФУС         [БЕ]ФШУС
SFX M   ФШУС ЕФЕУШ        [БЕ]ФШУС
SFX M   ФШУС ЕНУС         [БЕ]ФШУС
SFX M   ФШУС АФУС         [БЕ]ФШУС
SFX M   ФШУС АУШ          [БЕ]ФШУС
SFX M   ФШ   Ф            ХФШ
SFX M   ФШ   ЕЫШ          [БЕ]ФШ
SFX M   ФШ   ЕФЕ          [БЕ]ФШ
SFX M   ФШ   ЕФ           [БЕ]ФШ
SFX M   ФШ   ЕН           [БЕ]ФШ
SFX M   ФШ   АФ           [БЕ]ФШ
SFX M   ФШ   А            [БЕ]ФШ
SFX M   ФЙУШ ХФУС         [УЪ]ФЙУШ
SFX M   ФЙУШ ХУШ          [УЪ]ФЙУШ
SFX M   ФЙУШ ЕЫШУС        [УЪ]ФЙУШ
SFX M   ФЙУШ ЕФУС         [УЪ]ФЙУШ
SFX M   ФЙУШ ЕФЕУШ        [УЪ]ФЙУШ
SFX M   ФЙУШ ЕНУС         [УЪ]ФЙУШ
SFX M   ФЙУШ ДХФУС        КФЙУШ
SFX M   ФЙУШ ДХУШ         КФЙУШ
SFX M   ФЙУШ ДЕЫШУС       КФЙУШ
SFX M   ФЙУШ ДЕФУС        КФЙУШ
SFX M   ФЙУШ ДЕФЕУШ       КФЙУШ
SFX M   ФЙУШ ДЕНУС        КФЙУШ
SFX M   ФЙУШ ДЈЫШУС       КФЙУШ
SFX M   ФЙУШ ДЈФУС        КФЙУШ
SFX M   ФЙУШ ДЈФЕУШ       КФЙУШ
SFX M   ФЙУШ ДЈНУС        КФЙУШ
SFX M   ФЙУШ ЈЫШУС        [УЪ]ФЙУШ
SFX M   ФЙУШ ЈФУС         [УЪ]ФЙУШ
SFX M   ФЙУШ ЈФЕУШ        [УЪ]ФЙУШ
SFX M   ФЙУШ ЈНУС         [УЪ]ФЙУШ
SFX M   ФЙ   ХФ           [УЪ]ФЙ
SFX M   ФЙ   Х            [УЪ]ФЙ
SFX M   ФЙ   ЕЫШ          [УЪ]ФЙ
SFX M   ФЙ   ЕФЕ          [УЪ]ФЙ
SFX M   ФЙ   ЕФ           [УЪ]ФЙ
SFX M   ФЙ   ЕН           [УЪ]ФЙ
SFX M   ФЙ   ДХФ          КФЙ
SFX M   ФЙ   ДХ           КФЙ
SFX M   ФЙ   ДЕЫШ         КФЙ
SFX M   ФЙ   ДЕФЕ         КФЙ
SFX M   ФЙ   ДЕФ          КФЙ
SFX M   ФЙ   ДЕН          КФЙ
SFX M   ФЙ   ДЈЫШ         КФЙ
SFX M   ФЙ   ДЈФЕ         КФЙ
SFX M   ФЙ   ДЈФ          КФЙ
SFX M   ФЙ   ДЈН          КФЙ
SFX M   ФЙ   ЈЫШ          [УЪ]ФЙ
SFX M   ФЙ   ЈФЕ          [УЪ]ФЙ
SFX M   ФЙ   ЈФ           [УЪ]ФЙ
SFX M   ФЙ   ЈН           [УЪ]ФЙ
SFX M   ПФШУС ЕЫШУС        ПФШУС
SFX M   ПФШУС ЕФУС         ПФШУС
SFX M   ПФШУС ЕФЕУШ        ПФШУС
SFX M   ПФШУС ЕНУС         ПФШУС
SFX M   ПФШУС АФУС         ПФШУС
SFX M   ПФШУС АУШ          ПФШУС
SFX M   ПФШ  ЕЫШ          ПФШ
SFX M   ПФШ  ЕФЕ          ПФШ
SFX M   ПФШ  ЕФ           ПФШ
SFX M   ПФШ  ЕН           ПФШ
SFX M   ПФШ  АФ           ПФШ
SFX M   ПФШ  А            ПФШ

SFX L Y 63
SFX L   ЮШУС ЛУС          ЮШУС
SFX L   ЮШУС ЛУС          [^Е]ЮШУС
SFX L   ЮШУС ЛМПУШ        ЮШУС
SFX L   ЮШУС ЛМЙУШ        ЮШУС
SFX L   ЮШУС ЛМБУШ        ЮШУС
SFX L   ЮШ   ЛМП          ЮШ
SFX L   ЮШ   ЛМЙ          ЮШ
SFX L   ЮШ   ЛМБ          ЮШ
SFX L   ЮШ   Л            ЮШ
SFX L   ЮШ   Л            [^Е]ЮШ
SFX L   ЪФШ  Ъ            ЪФШ
SFX L   ЪФЙ  Ъ            ЪФЙ
SFX L   ФШУС УС           ЪФШУС
SFX L   ФШУС МУС          [^УЪ]ФШУС
SFX L   ФШУС МПУШ         [^У]ФШУС
SFX L   ФШУС МЙУШ         [^У]ФШУС
SFX L   ФШУС МБУШ         [^У]ФШУС
SFX L   ФШ   МП           [^У]ФШ
SFX L   ФШ   МЙ           [^У]ФШ
SFX L   ФШ   МБ           [^У]ФШ
SFX L   ФШ   М            [^УЪ]ФШ
SFX L   ФЙ   МП           ЪФЙ
SFX L   ФЙ   МЙ           ЪФЙ
SFX L   ФЙ   МБ           ЪФЙ
SFX L   УФШУС МУС          УФШУС
SFX L   УФШУС МПУШ         УФШУС
SFX L   УФШУС МЙУШ         УФШУС
SFX L   УФШУС МБУШ         УФШУС
SFX L   УФШ  МП           [^Ю].УФШ
SFX L   УФШ  МЙ           [^Ю].УФШ
SFX L   УФШ  МБ           [^Ю].УФШ
SFX L   УФШ  М            [^Ю].УФШ
SFX L   УФЙУШ МУС          УФЙУШ
SFX L   УФЙУШ МУС          [^Е]УФЙУШ
SFX L   УФЙУШ МПУШ         УФЙУШ
SFX L   УФЙУШ МЙУШ         УФЙУШ
SFX L   УФЙУШ МБУШ         УФЙУШ
SFX L   УФЙ  МП           УФЙ
SFX L   УФЙ  МЙ           УФЙ
SFX L   УФЙ  МБ           УФЙ
SFX L   УФЙ  М            УФЙ
SFX L   УФЙ  М            [^Е]УФЙ
SFX L   УС   МПУШ         [^БЙСШ]УС
SFX L   УС   МЙУШ         [^БЙСШ]УС
SFX L   УС   МБУШ         [^БЙСШ]УС
SFX L   МЪФЙ МЪ           МЪФЙ
SFX L   ЕЮШУС ЈЛУС         ЕЮШУС
SFX L   ЕЮШ  ЈЛ           ЕЮШ
SFX L   ЕЪФЙ ЈЪ           ЕЪФЙ
SFX L   ЕУФШ МП           ЮЕУФШ
SFX L   ЕУФШ МЙ           ЮЕУФШ
SFX L   ЕУФШ МБ           ЮЕУФШ
SFX L   ЕУФШ ЕМ           ЮЕУФШ
SFX L   ЕУФШ ЈМ           ЮЕУФШ
SFX L   ЕУФЙУШ ЈМУС         ЕУФЙУШ
SFX L   ЕУФЙ ЈМ           ЕУФЙ
SFX L   БУШ  ПУШ          БУШ
SFX L   БУШ  ЙУШ          БУШ
SFX L   Б    П            Б
SFX L   Б    Й            Б
SFX L   0    МП           [^БЙСШ]
SFX L   0    МЙ           [^БЙСШ]
SFX L   0    МБ           [^БЙСШ]

SFX K Y 55
SFX K   ЭЕ   Э            ЭЕ
SFX K   ШЕ   ЙК           ШЕ
SFX K   Ш    СНЙ          Ш
SFX K   Ш    СН           Ш
SFX K   Ш    СИ           Ш
SFX K   Ш    С            Ш
SFX K   Ш    Й            Ш
SFX K   Ш    ЕН           Ш
SFX K   Ш    ЕК           Ш
SFX K   Ш    Е            Ш
SFX K   Ш    А            Ш
SFX K   П    Х            П
SFX K   П    Й            [ЙЫЮ]ЛП
SFX K   П    Е            П
SFX K   П    БНЙ          П
SFX K   П    БН           П
SFX K   П    БИ           П
SFX K   П    Б            П
SFX K   П    0            [ДЗУФЧ]П
SFX K   К    СНЙ          К
SFX K   К    СН           К
SFX K   К    СИ           К
SFX K   К    С            К
SFX K   К    Й            ЙК
SFX K   К    Й            [АБЕПСХ]К
SFX K   К    ЕЧ           К
SFX K   К    ЕН           К
SFX K   К    Е            [^Й]К
SFX K   К    А            К
SFX K   Е    Х            [ГЦЫЭ]Е
SFX K   Е    СНЙ          [^ГЦЫЭ]Е
SFX K   Е    СН           [^ГЦЫЭ]Е
SFX K   Е    СИ           [^ГЦЫЭ]Е
SFX K   Е    С            [^ГЦЫЭ]Е
SFX K   Е    К            ЙЕ
SFX K   Е    Й            ЙЕ
SFX K   Е    ЕК           [^ГЙЦШЭ]Е
SFX K   Е    БНЙ          [ГЦЫЭ]Е
SFX K   Е    БН           [ГЦЫЭ]Е
SFX K   Е    БИ           [ГЦЫЭ]Е
SFX K   Е    Б            [ГЦЫЭ]Е
SFX K   Е    А            [^ГЦЫЭ]Е
SFX K   0    Щ            [^ЕЗИКЛПЦШЫЭЮ]
SFX K   0    Х            [^ЕКПШ]
SFX K   0    ПЧ           [^ГЕКПЦШЫЭЮ]
SFX K   0    ПН           [^ГЕКПЦШЫЭЮ]
SFX K   0    Н            П
SFX K   0    Н            Е
SFX K   0    Й            [ЗИЛЦЫЭЮ]
SFX K   0    ЕК           [ЦЫЭЮ]
SFX K   0    Е            [^ЕКПШ]
SFX K   0    БНЙ          [^ЕКПШ]
SFX K   0    БН           [^ЕКПШ]
SFX K   0    БИ           [^ЕКПШ]
SFX K   0    Б            [^ЕКПШ]
